Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 12
CHECK STATIONS — WASTE OF WILDLIFE

Sec.

§ 36-1201. Production of wildlife for inspection — Stop at checking stations — License must be on person.

No fisherman, hunter or trapper shall refuse or fail to:

Inspection of Wildlife. Upon request of the director, produce for inspection any wildlife in his possession.

Check Stations. Stop and report at a wildlife check station encountered on his route of travel when directed to do so by personnel on duty. Such direction may be accomplished by signs prominently displayed along the route of travel indicating those persons required to stop.

License to be Carried and Exhibited on Request. Have the proper required license, temporary license, authorization number or other information required by rule, on his person at all times when hunting, fishing or trapping and produce the same for inspection upon request of a conservation officer or any other person authorized to enforce fish and game laws. However, no person charged with violating this subsection shall be convicted if he produces in court a license, theretofore issued to him and valid at the time of his arrest.

§ 36-1202. Wasteful destruction of wildlife or mutilation unlawful.

It shall be unlawful to:

Waste. Through carelessness, neglect or otherwise, to allow or cause the waste of edible portions of any game animal, except for mountain lion, black bear, grizzly bear or gray wolf. “Edible portions” are defined as follows:

Game birds. Breasts;

Big game animals. Hind quarters, front quarters, loins and tenderloins;

Game fish. Fillets of fish, hind legs of bullfrogs and tails of crayfish;

Upland game animals. Hind legs, front legs and loins of rabbits and hares.

Destruction — Mutilation. Capture or kill any game animal and detach or remove from the carcass only the head, hide, antlers, horns or tusks and leave the edible portions to waste, except mountain lion, black bear, grizzly bear or gray wolf.

Prima Facie. It shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of the provisions of this section:

To fail to properly dress and care for any game animal killed by him, except mountain lion, black bear, grizzly bear or gray wolf; and

If the edible portions described in subsection (a) of this section are reasonably accessible, to fail to take or transport same to his camp within twenty-four (24) hours.

Livestock owners, their employees, agents and animal damage control personnel in protecting livestock as provided in subsection (b) of section 36-1107, Idaho Code, are exempt from subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

For purposes of this section, the term “game animal” shall mean game birds, big game animals, upland game animals and game fish.